src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ============================= !
!! # File containing abbreviations 
! ============================= !

!! ## Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 4 + 1  groups, because of the preprocessor
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation   !!= * **@CODE@**
ITRAB ;	   !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (intransitive abbrs)
TRNUMAB ;  !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numberals)

!! ## The sublexica
!! ### Dividing between abbreviations with and witout final period

LEXICON ab-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**
ab-nodot-adv ;
ab-dot-adv ;

!! ### The lexicons that add tags

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**  The bulk
+N+ABBR:   # ; ! no period, that is.

LEXICON ab-dot-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+N+ABBR:%.  # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+ABBR: # ; ! no period, that is.

LEXICON ab-dot-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+ABBR:%.  # ; ! Adv without case.

LEXICON ab-dot-adj   !!= * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+A+ABBR:%.  # ;



!! ## The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! Miscellaneous symbols, abbreviation symbols
! -------------------------------------------

LEXICON SYMBOLS   !!= * **@CODE@** is for iscellaneous abbr symbols
 §+N+ABBR:§    #  ; ! §:s
§§+N+ABBR:§§   #  ; !§§:ain
 $+N+ABBR:$    #  ; ! $:s
 €+N+ABBR:€    #  ; ! €:s
 £+N+ABBR:£    #  ; ! £:s
 ®+N+ABBR:® # ;
 ©+N+ABBR:© # ;


! =============================================== !
! Intransitive abbreviations 
! =============================================== !

LEXICON ITRAB   !!= * **@CODE@** are intransitive abbreviations, Ltd. etc.

! These may end sentences.

Dep  ab-noun ;
Ltd  ab-noun ;
Inc ab-noun ;


! Abbreviations that are not treated as abbreviations 
! at the end of the sentence 



! ============================================================ !
! Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals 
! ============================================================ !

LEXICON TRNUMAB   !!= * **@CODE@** contains abbreviations who are transitive in front of numerals 

!! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
!! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
!! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.

! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.


nr ab-dot-noun ; !



! =============================================== !
! Transitive abbreviations !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRAB   !!= * **@CODE@** contains transitive abbreviations

!! This lexicon is for abbrs that always have a constituent following it.

P.S ab-dot-noun ;
Dr ab-dot-noun ;
St ab-dot-noun ;
Mr ab-dot-noun ;
alt ab-dot-noun ;





! Here comes the initials
! They are found in names etc.

! 13.11.11: changed
! A:A ab-nodot-noun; !
! to
! A:A ab-dot-noun; !
! in order to harmonise with nob.

! A.-xyz   LOWER-CASE-DOUBLETS
A:A ab-dot-noun;
B:B ab-dot-noun;
C:C ab-dot-noun;
D:D ab-dot-noun;
E:E ab-dot-noun;
F:F ab-dot-noun;
G:G ab-dot-noun;
H:H ab-dot-noun;
I:I ab-dot-noun;
J:J ab-dot-noun;
K:K ab-dot-noun;
L:L ab-dot-noun;
M:M ab-dot-noun;
N:N ab-dot-noun;
O:O ab-dot-noun;
P:P ab-dot-noun;
Q:Q ab-dot-noun;
R:R ab-dot-noun;
S:S ab-dot-noun;
T:T ab-dot-noun;
U:U ab-dot-noun;
V:V ab-dot-noun;
W:W ab-dot-noun;
X:X ab-dot-noun;
Y:Y ab-dot-noun;
Z:Z ab-dot-noun;
Ä:Ä ab-dot-noun;


! a-klasse
á:á ab-nodot-noun;
a:a ab-nodot-noun; !
c:c ab-nodot-noun; !
d:d ab-nodot-noun; !
e:e ab-nodot-noun; !
f:f ab-nodot-noun; !
g:g ab-nodot-noun; !
h:h ab-nodot-noun; !
i:i ab-nodot-noun; !
j:j ab-nodot-noun; !
k:k ab-nodot-noun; !
l:l ab-nodot-noun; !
m:m ab-nodot-noun; !
n:n ab-nodot-noun; !
o:o ab-nodot-noun; !mysko
p:p ab-nodot-noun; !
q:q ab-nodot-noun; !
r:r ab-nodot-noun; !
s:s ab-nodot-noun; !
t:t ab-nodot-noun; !
u:u ab-nodot-noun; !
v:v ab-nodot-noun; !
w:w ab-nodot-noun; !
x:x ab-nodot-noun; !
y:y ab-nodot-noun; !
z:z ab-nodot-noun; !
ä:ä ab-nodot-noun; !

! a.-xyz
á:á ab-dot-noun;
a:a ab-dot-noun; !
c:c ab-dot-noun; !
d:d ab-dot-noun; !
e:e ab-dot-noun; !
f:f ab-dot-noun; !
g:g ab-dot-noun; !
h:h ab-dot-noun; !
i:i ab-dot-noun; !
j:j ab-dot-noun; !
k:k ab-dot-noun; !
l:l ab-dot-noun; !
m:m ab-dot-noun; !
n:n ab-dot-noun; !
o:o ab-dot-noun; !
p:p ab-dot-noun; !
q:q ab-dot-noun; !
r:r ab-dot-noun; !
s:s ab-dot-noun; !
t:t ab-dot-noun; !
u:u ab-dot-noun; !
v:v ab-dot-noun; !
w:w ab-dot-noun; !
x:x ab-dot-noun; !
y:y ab-dot-noun; !
z:z ab-dot-noun; !
ä:ä ab-dot-noun; !
